Idaho statutes. TITLE 33 EDUCATION
CHAPTER 57
INTERSTATE COMPACT ON EDUCATIONAL OPPORTUNITY FOR MILITARY CHILDREN

Section.

33-5701. Interstate compact on educational opportunity for military children.

The “Interstate Compact on Educational Opportunity for Military Children” is hereby enacted into law and entered into by this state with any other states legally joining therein in the form substantially as follows:

ARTICLE I

ARTICLE II

ARTICLE III

ARTICLE IV

ARTICLE V

ARTICLE VI

ARTICLE VII

ARTICLE VIII

ARTICLE IX

ARTICLE X

ARTICLE XI

ARTICLE XIII

ARTICLE XIV

ARTICLE XV

ARTICLE XVI

ARTICLE XVII

ARTICLE XVIII